District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1107.03

Authority of Council.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 472, Pub. L. 93-376, title VII, § 707
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1473.
1973 Ed., § 1-1193.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).